Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. In General
§ 34-1-120.
Unrecorded conveyance void as to subsequent purchasers recording first.

Every conveyance of real estate within this state, hereafter made, which shall not be recorded as required by law, shall be void, as against any subsequent purchaser or purchasers in good faith and for a valuable consideration of the same real estate or any portion thereof, whose conveyance shall be first duly recorded.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 18; R.S. 1899, § 2762; C.S. 1910, § 3654; C.S. 1920, § 4610; R.S. 1931, § 97-135; C.S. 1945, § 66-119; W.S. 1957, § 34-20.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring recordation of mortgage in connection with foreclosure and power of sale, see §

34-4-103

.

The transfer of title by eminent domain is not a conveyance

within the meaning of this section. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

And the failure to record an instrument which is not required to be recorded does not affect or vitiate the instrument

as to anyone, and it is valid not only between the parties thereto, but also as to subsequent purchasers and encumbrances. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

Where the state acquired land by eminent domain under condemnation proceedings in 1950, the title the state acquired was valid and good against any subsequent purchaser, since prior to 1953 no statute required the transfer of title by eminent domain to be recorded in the ordinary and regular books of record kept for transfer of property by conveyances. State ex rel. State Highway Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1956).

Unacknowledged instrument is not entitled to be recorded. —

An instrument of conveyance which was not acknowledged was not entitled to be placed of record under the laws of this state. North Am. Uranium v. Johnston, 77 Wyo. 332, 316 P.2d 325,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1957); Torgeson v. Connelly, 348 P.2d 63,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1959).

Where there are conveyances of adjoining parcels in a tract of land,

this section applies only to the parties to whom there was a conveyance “of the same real estate or any portion thereof …,” and where the conveyances to the other land owners conflicted with no others, they acquired good title against all the world without recording. Condos v. Trapp, 739 P.2d 749,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 467

(Wyo. 1987).

Judgment creditor not protected against prior unrecorded conveyance. —

Where trust deed, though not entitled to record for failure to comply with statute, is good as between the parties, a judgment creditor, before sale of mortgaged premises under execution issued on his judgment, is not subsequent purchaser in good faith for value protected against a prior unrecorded conveyance. Frank v. Hicks, 4 Wyo. 502, 35 P. 475,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 4 Wyo. 502, 35 P. 475,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1894).

No collateral attack on unrecorded deed executed before bankruptcy. —

There being no subsequent purchaser in good faith before the court, a deed conveying Wyoming land, executed more than 4 months before bankruptcy petition was filed, though not recorded, was not subject to attack as preferential under Bankruptcy Act. Hoshaw v. Cosgriff, 247 F. 22, 1917 U.S. App. LEXIS 1630 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1917).

Purchasers were not bona fide due to title defect. —

Trial court properly dismissed assignees' action against defendants for a declaration that an easement was void; the assignees, who were “purchasers” within the meaning of the recording act, could not demonstrate that they were bona fide purchasers, where the assignment itself reflected a defect in the title, i.e., it was retained by the State of Wyoming. Any effort to check the records would have revealed that the assignor lacked the ability to convey legal title.
Bentley v. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs., 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2007).

Bona fide purchasers. —

Limited liability company (LLC) was not a bona fide purchaser of an irrigation district's property, but simply had an equity interest in the property. Because the contract for the sale of the property to the LLC was executory, there had been no conveyance of the property, and this section provided no remedy to the LLC.
Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Ag, 2009 WY 143, 221 P.3d 306,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Nov. 23, 2009).

Doctrine of bona fide purchaser applies even when deed's original grantor alleges incompetence.

Such a deed is voidable, not void. As against voidable deeds, the protections granted under the doctrine of bona fide purchaser are complete and apply regardless of the state of the grantor's competence, so long as the purchaser had no notice of the claimed incompetence. First Interstate Bank v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A., 762 P.2d 379,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1988).

Pleading good faith purchase. —

If it is necessary to plead purchase in good faith in action to quiet title by grantee in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor, it is plaintiff's duty to do it. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Burden of proving good faith purchase on subsequent grantee. —

In the case of York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1944), the court held that the burden of proof is on the subsequent purchaser to show that he purchased the property in question in good faith and without notice. North Am. Uranium v. Johnston, 77 Wyo. 332, 316 P.2d 325,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1957).

Burden to prove that he was purchaser in good faith for valuable consideration and without notice is upon grantee under subsequent conveyance which is first recorded in quiet title action. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

To avail themselves of this section and cut off the rights of a lessee, a purchaser from the lessor has the burden of proving he was a purchaser in good faith for valuable consideration and without notice. Soppe v. Breed, 504 P.2d 1077,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1973).

And was not sustained. —

Plaintiff, a subsequent purchaser of mining claims, did not sustain burden of proof that he purchased claims in good faith and without notice of prior conveyance of claims to defendant, where attorney testified that he told plaintiff that defendant had a prior conveyance of the claims, and that there would probably be a controversy as to the claims, since defendant claimed them as his own. North Am. Uranium v. Johnston, 77 Wyo. 332, 316 P.2d 325,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1957).

Failure to record an instrument does not render it void as to subsequent purchasers where prior to the conveyance the purchasers were put on due inquiry and where upon reasonable investigation the fact of the existence of the instrument could have been determined. Soppe v. Breed, 504 P.2d 1077,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1973).

Bad faith not established. —

Subsequent purchaser's actions did not constitute bad faith, removing her from the protection afforded by this section. Grose v. Sauvageau, 942 P.2d 398,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1997).

Issue of consideration raised. —

In quiet title action by grantee in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor, where plaintiff did not plead source of title and defendant denied plaintiff's title, question of consideration for subsequent deed was put in issue as near as possible in view of pleadings. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Effect of recital of consideration. —

Recitals of consideration in subsequently executed but first recorded deed from same grantor are not evidence of consideration against first grantee, except where parties to subsequent conveyance are dead. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Inadequate consideration. —

Payment by attorney to client of $9.00 and some cents for taxes client had paid during year and absorbing a $15.00 charge to client for writing 3 or 4 letters concerning grazing lease and for taking notary to client was not fair or adequate consideration for deed to 320 acres of homestead realty. York v. James, 62 Wyo. 184, 165 P.2d 109,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1946).

Insufficient notice of prior conveyance. —

Provision in recorded lease of land for drilling water wells that lease payments should be made to lessors personally or in care of witness to instrument or deposited to lessors' credit in such witness' account was not enough to put subsequent purchaser on notice of previous unrecorded conveyance to such witness. York v. James, 62 Wyo. 184, 165 P.2d 109,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1946).

Inquiry notice. —

Subsequent purchaser who diligently searched the records only to discover that occupants' possession of the property was consistent with the rights of the record owner was not put on inquiry notice. Grose v. Sauvageau, 942 P.2d 398,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1997).

Defective assignment of palpable error noticed. —

Assignment of palpable error though defective in form will be noticed by supreme court where cursory examination of record shows judgment is not sustained by any evidence and is contrary to law. York v. James, 60 Wyo. 222, 148 P.2d 596,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

Doenz v. Garber, 665 P.2d 932,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1983); Bowers Welding & Hotshot, Inc. v. Bromley, 699 P.2d 299,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Dame v. Mileski, 80 Wyo. 156, 340 P.2d 205,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1959); Wyoming Dep't of Revenue & Taxation-Excise Tax Div. v. First Wyo. Bank, 718 P.2d 31,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 540

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Hawkins v. Stoffers, 40 Wyo. 226, 276 P. 452,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1929); Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1939).

Stated

in

Esterholdt v. Pacificorp, 2013 WY 64,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 22, 2013).

Law reviews. —

“Creditors' Rights Under the Recording Statutes,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 125.

“Recording the Land Contract,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 208.

“Quitclaim Holder as a Bona Fide Purchaser,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 306.

See comment, “Remedial Title Legislation for Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 561 (1972).

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adverse possession by one claiming under or through deed by cotenant as affected by failure to record deed, 32 ALR2d 1214.

§ 34-1-121.
Recorded instrument as notice to subsequent purchasers; recordation of instruments issued by United States or state of Wyoming.

Each and every deed, mortgage, instrument or conveyance touching any interest in lands, made and recorded, according to the provisions of this chapter, shall be notice to and take precedence of any subsequent purchaser or purchasers from the time of the delivery of any instrument at the office of the county clerk, for record. Any and all instruments or other documents, or copies of instruments or other documents duly certified by any agency, department or bureau of the United States or the state of Wyoming having charge of the records of the instruments or other documents, conveying, remising or demising, or otherwise affecting:

Real estate on any Indian reservation and relating to any period the real estate may be or has been held by the United States in trust for an Indian or Indians or Indian tribe, or restricted against alienation under the laws of the United States, or any interest in the real estate; or

Real estate, or any interest therein, or any assignment thereof, issued by the United States or the state of Wyoming, or any agency, department or bureau of either thereof, including mineral leases and assignments thereof, certificates of purchase or payment for public lands issued by the receiver of the land office, shall be entitled to record under this chapter, and the record of all instruments or other documents shall have the same effect to all intents and purposes as though the same were acknowledged and otherwise executed as required by the provisions of this chapter relating to conveyances.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 17; Laws 1890, ch. 76, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2761; C.S. 1910, § 3653; C.S. 1920, § 4609; R.S. 1931, § 97-134; C.S. 1945, § 66-116; W.S. 1957, § 34-21; Laws 1961, ch. 156, § 1; 1973, ch. 39, § 1; 1995, ch. 158, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds (county clerk)” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Condominium assessment lien binds subsequent mortgagee interest. —

A condominium association's lien for assessments was a contractual lien which related back to the time that the condominium declaration was recorded and, as a covenant running with the land, bound the holders and assignees of a subsequent mortgagee interest. American Holidays, Inc. v. Foxtail Owners Ass'n, 821 P.2d 577,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1991).

Constructive notice by recording is a matter entirely dependent upon statute.

Torgeson v. Connelly, 348 P.2d 63,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1959).

Duty to search record. —

In action for specific performance of contract whereby defendant agreed to buy of plaintiff all interest of plaintiff in property, consisting of first mortgage on land properly foreclosed, and on which period of exercise of right of redemption was running, defendant was not entitled to escape liability on ground that there was bilateral mistake of fact as to subject matter of contract which induced agreement, because subordinate judgment lienholders had obtained sheriff's deed to property, in view of evidence that certificate of sale in favor of such lienholders was of record, but defendant made no search of record, and that such lienholder did not redeem from plaintiff's first mortgage. Paul v. Harris, 40 Wyo. 261, 276 P. 444,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1929).

A subsequent purchaser for value has constructive notice of any burden upon title from the date of recordation.

Crozier v. Malone, 366 P.2d 125,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1961).

The filing or leaving of a conveyance in any office other than that of the register of deeds cannot constitute constructive notice.

Torgeson v. Connelly, 348 P.2d 63,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1959).

Nor can recordation of an unrecordable instrument. —

An escrow agreement, although not recordable because unacknowledged, does not become recordable by purchaser's attachment to it of his acknowledged description and, when recorded, does not constitute constructive notice to subsequent purchasers of initial purchaser's interest. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

Failure to record executory contract for sale or purchase of land. —

It is true that an executory contract for the sale or purchase of land is not by statute required to be recorded, and therefore, failure to record such an instrument does not vitiate it as to subsequent purchasers — interests thus engendered being determined according to general principles of law and equity, which give weight to numerous common-law maxims, including the one that, “he who is first in time has the better right.” However, the mere chronology of transactions is not sufficient to bring such principles to play in favor of a defendant. Low v. Sanger, 478 P.2d 60,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1970).

No collateral attack on unrecorded deed executed before bankruptcy. —

There being no subsequent purchaser in good faith before the court, a deed conveying Wyoming land, executed more than 4 months before bankruptcy petition, was filed, though not recorded, was not subject to attack as preferential under Bankruptcy Act. Hoshaw v. Cosgriff, 247 F. 22, 1917 U.S. App. LEXIS 1630 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1917).

Priority of assignments.—

When separate
interests in the same parcel were assigned to a bank and to another
assignee, the bank's recording of the bank's interest before the
recording
of the other assignee's interest did not give the bank's
assignment
precedence because the recording statute did not transform
two separate
interests in property into one. Halling v. Yovanovich, 2017 WY 28, 391 P.3d 611,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2017).

Doctrine of bona fide purchaser applies even when deed's original grantor alleges incompetence.

Such a deed is voidable, not void. As against voidable deeds, the protections granted under the doctrine of bona fide purchaser are complete and apply regardless of the state of the grantor's competence, so long as the purchaser had no notice of the claimed incompetence. First Interstate Bank v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A., 762 P.2d 379,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1988).

A subsequent mortgagee has constructive notice of prior recorded liens and is not entitled to equitable subrogation. —

District court properly granted summary judgment to a bank in a mortgage foreclosure action because it would have been improper to apply the doctrine of equitable subrogation to allow a refinancing mortgagee to be subrogated to the priority lien position held by an original mortgagee as this statute was clearly a filing date priority statute and the refinancing mortgagee, which was considered a purchaser under W.S. §

34-1-101

, had constructive notice of a prior lien held by a bank.
Countrywide Home Loans, Inc. v. First Nat'l Bank of Steamboat Springs, 2006 WY 132, 144 P.3d 1224,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(2006).

Applied

in

Elliott v. Sioux Oil Co., 191 F. Supp. 847, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5108 (D. Wyo. 1960); Bowers Welding & Hotshot, Inc. v. Bromley, 699 P.2d 299,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1985); Marple v. Wyoming Prod. Credit Ass'n, 750 P.2d 1315,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1988); River Props. Pshp. v. Willoughby, 944 P.2d 1145,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Dame v. Mileski, 80 Wyo. 156, 340 P.2d 205,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1959); Wyoming Dep't of Revenue & Taxation-Excise Tax Div. v. First Wyo. Bank, 718 P.2d 31,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 540

(Wyo. 1986); Newman v. American Nat'l Bank, 780 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1989); Esterholdt v. Pacificorp, 2013 WY 64,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 22, 2013).

Cited

in

Hawkins v. Stoffers, 40 Wyo. 226, 276 P. 452,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1929); Barnhart Drilling Co. v. Petroleum Fin., Inc., 807 P.2d 411,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

See “Recording the Land Contract,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 208.

See note, “Recording Federal Oil and Gas Leases,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 237 (1961).

See comment, “Subsidence Regulations,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 543 (1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Record of instrument which comprises or includes interest of or right that is not a proper subject of record, 3 ALR2d 577.

Regulations as to filing or recording of subdivision maps or plats, 11 ALR2d 524.

Personal covenant in recorded deed as enforceable against grantee, lessee or successor, 23 ALR2d 520.

Necessity that mortgage covering oil and gas lease be recorded as real estate mortgage and/or filed or recorded as chattel mortgage, 34 ALR2d 902.

Reinstatement and restoration of mortgages released or discharged without authorization, as against subsequent purchasers, lienholders, judgment creditors, and the like, without notice, 35 ALR2d 948.

Record of instrument without sufficient acknowledgment as notice, 59 ALR2d 1299.

Solid mineral royalty as real or personal property for recording purposes, 68 ALR2d 732.

Record of incorrect instrument as notice of intended contents, 79 ALR2d 1180.

Reformation as against third person of instrument mistakenly describing property as affected by its record, 79 ALR2d 1180.

Reformation as against third person of instrument mistakenly describing property as affected by its record, 79 ALR2d 1180.

Record of instrument incorrectly describing property as notice of intended contents affecting right to reformation of instrument, 79 ALR2d 1180.

Sufficiency of designation of taxpayer in recorded notice of federal tax lien, 3 ALR3d 633.

Recorded real property instrument as charging third party with constructive notice of provisions of extrinsic instrument referred to therein, 89 ALR3d 901.

Vendor's obligation to disclose to purchaser of land presence of contamination from hazardous substances or wastes, 12 ALR5th 630.

§ 34-1-122.
Force and effect of conveyances prior to act.

All conveyances of real estate heretofore made and acknowledged or proved in accordance with the laws of this state in force at the time of such making, acknowledgment or proof, shall have the same force as evidence, and be recorded in the same manner and with like effect as conveyances executed and acknowledged in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 28; R.S. 1899, § 2758; C.S. 1910, § 3650; C.S. 1920, § 4606; R.S. 1931, § 97-131; C.S. 1945, § 66-129; W.S. 1957, § 34-22.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

34-1-101

.

§ 34-1-123.
Admissibility of conveyance or record thereof as evidence.

All deeds, mortgages, conveyances or instruments of any character, concerning any interest in lands within this state, which shall be executed, acknowledged, attested or proved in accordance with the provisions of this act or the laws of this state, or the local laws of any mining district wherein such real estate is situate, in force at the date of such acknowledgment, attestation or proof, may be read in evidence, without in the first instance additional proof of the execution thereof, and the record of any such deed, mortgage, conveyance or instrument, whether an original record of any mining district, or a copy thereof deposited in the register’s [county clerk’s] office of any county, in accordance with the laws of this state (as a part of the records of such mining district) or a record of such recorder’s office, when the same appears by such record to be properly acknowledged, attested or proved in accordance with the laws of this state, or of the proper mining district in force at the date of such acknowledgment, attestation or proof, or a transcript from any such record, certified by the register [county clerk] of the proper county where such deed, mortgage, conveyance or instrument ought by law to be recorded, may, upon the affidavit of the party desiring to use the same, that the original thereof is not in his possession or power to produce, be read in evidence with like effect as the original of such deed, mortgage, conveyance or instrument properly acknowledged, attested or proved as aforesaid, but the effect of such evidence may be rebutted by other competent testimony.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 2739; C.S. 1910, § 3631; C.S. 1920, § 4587; R.S. 1931, § 97-112; C.S. 1945, § 66-120; W.S. 1957, § 34-23.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

34-1-101

.

Additional proof of execution not initially required. —

A power of attorney to convey lands, as well as an executory contract for sale or purchase of lands may be read in evidence without in first instance offering additional proof of execution. 16 Wyo. 161, 92 P. 624.

Tax title claimant. —

Statutory provision that the records of the clerk of county commissioners is sufficient to prove tax sale did not change rule that tax title claimant has the burden of proving that statutory provisions have been complied with. Barrett v. Barrett, 46 Wyo. 84, 23 P.2d 857,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1933).

Prima facie case. —

Where plaintiff introduced deed from Mrs. S. and her husband, since deceased, proved they were in possession, and filed an action wherein validity of the deed was affirmed on appeal, prima facie case was established. Atlas Realty Co. v. Rowray, 51 Wyo. 318, 65 P.2d 1122,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1937).

Cited

in

First Nat'l Bank v. Citizens' State Bank, 11 Wyo. 32, 70 P. 726,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1902).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of Fed. R. Evid. 902, which relates to self-authentication, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

§ 34-1-124.
Federal land office instruments; generally; railway maps and affidavits; recording and recording fees.

Patents heretofore or hereafter issued by the United States, for lands and certificates of purchase or payment for public lands, heretofore or hereafter issued by the receiver of any land office of the United States, shall be entitled to be recorded under the provisions of this chapter, and the record of all such instruments shall have the effect to all intents and purposes, as though same were acknowledged and otherwise executed as required by law; provided, that any railroad company, having a right-of-way or station grounds, acquired in conformity to an act of the congress of the United States, requiring a map thereof, to be approved by the secretary of the interior, shall file with the county clerk, of any county in this state, wherein such right-of-way and station grounds may be, a copy of such map, duly authenticated, together with the affidavit of any officer or agent of such railroad company, describing by quarter sections the lands within such county, affected by such right-of-way, which were public lands when such map was approved, and it shall be the duty of such county clerk to record said affidavit, and file said map, and to note upon the abstract of lands of his office as to each quarter section so described, that a right-of-way across the same is claimed by the company filing said map; provided, further, that the fee for filing said map and recording said affidavit, shall be two dollars ($2.00).

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, § 2757; C.S. 1910, § 3649; Laws 1911, ch. 91, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4605; R.S. 1931, § 97-130; C.S. 1945, § 66-117; W.S. 1957, § 34-24; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to filing plats of lands obtained from state by railroads, see §

37-9-203

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds” throughout the section.

Law reviews. —

See “Record of Mineral Reservations in Patent,” 12 Wyo. L.J. 151 (1958).

§ 34-1-125.
Federal land office instruments; as evidence.

The certificate of purchase or payment issued by the receiver of any land office of the United States, or the record thereof, or if the same be lost or destroyed or beyond the reach of the person entitled thereto, secondary evidence of its contents, is proof of the title to the lands described therein, equivalent to a patent against all except the United States or the holder of a patent from the United States.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 76, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2740; C.S. 1910, § 3632; C.S. 1920, § 4588; R.S. 1931, § 97-113; C.S. 1945, § 66-118; W.S. 1957, § 34-25.

Cited

in

Muir v. Bosey, 23 Wyo. 46, 146 P. 595,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1915).

§ 34-1-126.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 26, related to liability of county clerks for recording improperly executed conveyances.

§ 34-1-127.
Effect on purported absolute conveyance of unrecorded deed of defeasance.

When a deed or mortgage purports to be an absolute conveyance in terms, but is made or intended to be made defeasible by force of defeasance, or other instrument for that purpose, the original conveyance shall not be thereby defeated or affected as against any person other than the maker of the defeasance, or his heirs or devisees, or persons having actual notice thereof, unless the instrument of defeasance shall have been recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county where the lands lie.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 2763; C.S. 1910, § 3655; C.S. 1920, § 4611; R.S. 1931, § 97-136; C.S. 1945, § 66-121; W.S. 1957, § 34-27; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds.”

Quoted in

Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(May 30, 2014).

Applied

in

Marple v. Wyoming Prod. Credit Ass'n, 750 P.2d 1315,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Hein v. Lee, 549 P.2d 286,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 34-1-128.
Recorded assignment of mortgage.

The recording of the assignment of a mortgage, shall not in itself, be deemed notice of such assignment to the mortgagor, his heirs or personal representatives, so as to invalidate any payment made by them or either of them to the mortgagee.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 2764; C.S. 1910, § 3656; C.S. 1920, § 4612; R.S. 1931, § 97-137; C.S. 1945, § 66-122; W.S. 1957, § 34-28.

Cross references. —

As to necessity of recording assignment of mortgage with reference to foreclosure and power of sale, see §

34-4-103

.

§ 34-1-129.
Husband or wife may appoint each other as attorney-in-fact to control interests.

A husband or wife may constitute the other his or her attorney-in-fact to control or dispose of his or her property, or any inchoate or other interest therein and may revoke the same to the same extent and in the same manner as other persons.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 75, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2738; C.S. 1910, § 3630; C.S. 1920, § 4586; R.S. 1931, § 97-111; C.S. 1945, § 66-126; W.S. 1957, § 34-29.

Cross references. —

For provisions authorizing wife to release and convey her interest in realty, see §§

34-1-108

,

34-1-109

.

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

§ 34-1-130.
County clerk to discharge mortgage or deed of trust on record when certificate of release recorded.

Any mortgage or deed of trust shall be discharged upon the record thereof, by the county clerk in whose custody it shall be, or in whose office it is recorded, when there shall be recorded in his office a certificate or deed of release executed by the mortgagee, trustee or beneficiary, his assignee or legally authorized representative, or by a title agent or title insurer acting in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

34-1-145

through

34-1-150

, acknowledged or proven and certified as by law prescribed to entitle conveyances to be recorded, specifying that such mortgage or deed of trust has been paid or otherwise satisfied or discharged, and the county clerk shall make a reference to such release in the record.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 28; 1890, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2800; C.S. 1910, § 3692; C.S. 1920, § 4650; R.S. 1931, § 71-222; C.S. 1945, § 66-132; W.S. 1957, § 34-31; Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 2; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the last sentence, substituted “in” for “upon the margin of,” and deleted “of the mortgage or trust deed.”

No consideration for quitclaim deed. —

Finding of no consideration for quitclaim deed executed by mortgagee on day purchaser of land assumed to pay mortgage held proper. Chesney v. Valley Live Stock Co., 34 Wyo. 378, 244 P. 216,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1926).

And mortgage not released. —

Quitclaim deed from mortgagee to assignee of mortgagor will not operate as release of mortgage if not so intended. Chesney v. Valley Live Stock Co., 34 Wyo. 378, 244 P. 216,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1926).

Failure to record release. —

Because a debtor's note was set-off against her obligation to a limited liability company (LLC) as allowed by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-15-417

, the note was satisfied and a mortgage terminated at the time the LLC answered a creditor's writ of garnishment. As the debtor did not file her petition until after that date, the mortgage was not property of the estate, regardless of the fact that the LLC did not file a cancellation form or discharge as required under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

34-2-113

and

34-1-130

, and thus, the creditor did not violate the automatic stay by seeking to foreclose on the LLC's property.
In re Ford, 2013 Bankr. LEXIS 179 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Jan. 16, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requiring security as condition of cancelling of record mortgage or lien or of recording payment, 2 ALR2d 1064.

Agreement by mortgagee for partial release of mortgage as enduring in favor of mortgagors or against mortgagee's privies, 41 ALR3d 7.

Construction of provision in real estate mortgage, land contract, or other security instrument for release of separate parcels of land as payments are made, 41 ALR3d 7.

§ 34-1-131.
Force and effect of section 34-1-130 on mortgages and deeds of trust executed and deeds of trust discharged prior to act.

The preceding section [§

34-1-130

], as hereby amended, shall apply to all mortgages and deeds of trust, heretofore as well as those which may be hereafter, executed and the release or discharge of any deed of trust heretofore made in accordance with said section, by the trustee named in said deed of trust or his successor, is hereby legalized and declared to be as binding upon all parties in interest as though such release or discharge had been made after the passage of this act [§§

34-1-130

,

34-1-131

].

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 6, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2801; C.S. 1910, § 3693; C.S. 1920, § 4651; R.S. 1931, § 71-223; C.S. 1945, § 66-133; W.S. 1957, § 34-32.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3, ch. 6, Laws 1890, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 13, 1890.

§ 34-1-132.
Liability of mortgagee for failing to discharge; damage limitations; definition.

A mortgagee shall, within thirty (30) days after having received by certified or registered mail a request in writing for the discharge or release of a mortgage, execute and acknowledge a certificate or deed of discharge or release of the mortgage if there has been full performance of the condition of the mortgage and if there is no other written agreement between the mortgagee and mortgagor encumbering the property subject to the mortgage.

A mortgagee who fails or refuses to discharge or release a mortgage within the thirty (30) day period required by subsection (a) of this section is liable to the mortgagor or his assignees for:

All actual damages resulting from the mortgagee’s failure or refusal to discharge or release the mortgage; and

Special damages in the amount of one-tenth of one percent (.10%) of the original principal amount of the mortgage for each additional day after the thirty (30) day period until the mortgage is released or discharged. Special damages authorized by this paragraph shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day.

Notwithstanding any assignment of the mortgage, the mortgagee of record is liable for the damages specified in subsection (b) of this section unless, within sixty (60) days after receipt of the request for discharge or release as provided by subsection (a) of this section, he furnishes to the person making the request the name and address of the current assignee or holder of the mortgage who has legal authority to execute the discharge or release.

As used in this section “mortgagee” means the mortgagee named in the original mortgage or, if assigned, the current holder of the mortgage or the servicing agent for the current holder of the mortgage.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 29; R.S. 1887, § 32; R.S. 1899, § 2804; C.S. 1910, § 3696; C.S. 1920, § 4654; R.S. 1931, § 71-226; C.S. 1945, § 66-134; W.S. 1957, § 34-33; Laws 1989, ch. 63, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 1, Laws 1882, contained a § 30 which read: “All words in this act importing the singular number may be construed as meaning the plural, and those importing the plural may be construed as meaning the singular, and all words importing the masculine gender may be construed as meaning females.”

Prior compilers omitted this section.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 31, ch. 1, Laws 1882, reads: “Chapter 3 of the Compiled Laws being an act concerning alienation by deed and for other purposes, and chapter 40 of the Compiled Laws being an act to provide for the recording of deeds, mortgages, etc., and chapter 23 of the Session Laws of 1879 being an act concerning alienation by deed and for other purposes, and all other acts or parts of acts inconsistent with or in conflict with this act be and the same are hereby repealed.”

Failure to discharge not found. —

There was no failure to discharge a mortgage in violation of the statute since letters provided by the mortgagor evidenced merely an offer to render full performance where the letters stated that the mortgagor stood “ready to pay off the entire principal and interest due” on the mortgage and that a bank “can close the loan … and the funds would be available immediately, as long as there is a release of mortgage.” Hansen v. Little Bear Inn Co., 9 P.3d 960,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2000).

Damages not allowed when service is by publication. —

Where mortgagee was served only by publication, though her attorney who received payment was made a party defendant, no judgment for the penalty prescribed by this section could be allowed for the mortgagee's failure to cancel mortgage. Cadle v. McLimans, 23 Wyo. 515, 153 P. 901,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1915).

Cited

in

Johnson v. Smith, 455 P.2d 244,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Trustee's duty and liability as to release of mortgage, or deed of trust, 90 ALR2d 501.

Damages recoverable for real-estate mortgagee's refusal to discharge mortgage or give partial release therefrom, 8 ALR4th 853.

Construction mortgagee-lender's duty to protect interest of subordinated purchase-money mortgagee, 13 ALR5th 684.